Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB511.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 38 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1307. Korean War Veterans Armistice Day.(a) Legislative findings and declarations.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) The Korean War was fought in the Korean Peninsula from 1950 to 1953 and involved North Korea in conflict with South Korea supported by the United States.(2) The United States became involved in the Korean War on account of Cold War tensions promoting fear of Communism spreading into South Korea and throughout Asia.(3) On June 25, 1950, the Korean People's Army of North 1234567891011121314151617 Korea invaded South Korea, leading to the acquisition of South Korea's capital, Seoul.(4) Following the invasion of South Korea, President Harry Truman ordered the United States Armed Forces to support South Korea on June 27, 1950, to serve as a police action.(5) On July 1, 1950, the first ground troops of the United States Armed Forces arrived in South Korea.(6) Prior to the invasion of South Korea, only 510 troops were based in South Korea.(7) By 1953, a peak of approximately 326,863 troops was reached.(8) On July 27, 1953, the Korean War Armistice was signed, preserving the independence of North Korea and South Korea while maintaining a demilitarized zone between the two nations. A formal peace treaty was never signed.(9) In December 2021, South Korea, North Korea, China and the United States agreed to declare a formal end to the Korean War.(10) Approximately 36,000 members of the United States Armed Forces lost their lives in Korea, more than 92,000 were wounded and 8,000 were missing.(11) The Korean War has been referred to as the Forgotten War from a lack of media attention following World War II.(12) The insufficient public awareness does not allow the members of the United States Armed Forces who served bravely and faithfully for the United States to be duly recognized.(13) In 1995, the Korean War Veterans Memorial was 20250SB0511PN0471 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 completed and dedicated in the District of Columbia to commemorate those members of the United States Armed Forces who served in Korea.(b) Designation.--July 27 of each year shall be designated as Korean War Veterans Armistice Day in this Commonwealth.(c) Proclamation.--The Governor shall issue annually a proclamation encouraging all public schools and educational institutions to observe Korean War Veterans Armistice Day and conduct exercises recognizing the contributions of all those involved in the Korean War and remembering the sacrifices they made for their country. The proclamation may not mandate a public school or educational institution to participate in the observance.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0511PN0471 - 3 - 1234567891011121314